sl-SI: Material odmevnika: Pozlačeno; Novo srebro; Srebro; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
sv: Munstyckets material: Guldpläterad; Nysilver; Silver; Rostfritt stål; Annat
da: Materiale i det S-formede rør: Guldbelagt; Nysølv; Sølv; Rustfrit stål; Andet
zh-CN: 吹嘴管材质: 镀金; 镍银; 银质; 不锈钢; 其他
pl: Materiał esu: Pozłacany; Nowe srebro; Srebro; Stal nierdzewna; Inne
pt-PT: Material do bocal: Folheado a ouro; Alpaca; Prata; Aço inoxidável; Outro
el: Υλικό μεταλλικού λαιμού: Επιχρυσωμένο; Αλπακάς; Ασήμι; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Άλλο
it: Materiale del bocal: Placcato oro; Alpacca; Argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
nb: Materiale i krok: Gullbelagt; Nysølv; Sølv; Rustfritt stål; Annet
tr: Bokal malzemesi: Altın kaplama; Nikel gümüş; Gümüş; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal puhačke cijevi: Pozlaćeno; Novo srebro; Srebro; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
fi: S-putken materiaali: Kullattu; Uushopea; Hopea; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
es: Material bocal: Bañado en oro; Alpaca; Plata; Acero inoxidable; Otro
hu: Bokál anyaga: Aranyozott; Újezüst; Ezüst; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
vi: Chất liệu ống thổi bocal: Mạ vàng; Bạc niken; Bạc; Thép không gỉ; Khác
ja: ボーカル素材: 金メッキ; 洋白; 銀; ステンレス; その他
en: Bocal material: Gold-plated; Nickel silver; Silver; Stainless steel; Other
zh-TW: 吹管材質: 鍍金; 鎳銀; 銀; 不鏽鋼; 其他
ko: 보칼 소재: 금도금; 양백; 은; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
lt-LT: Vamzdelių medžiaga: Paauksuota; Naujasidabris; Sidabras; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
ru: Материал S-образной трубки: Позолоченный; Нейзильбер; Серебро; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
cs: Materiál trysky: Pozlacené; Nové stříbro; Stříbrné; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
th: วัสดุของโบคัล: ชุบทอง; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; เงิน; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau du bocal: Plaqué or; Maillechort; Argent; Acier inoxydable; Autre
sk-SK: Materiál náustku: Pozlátené; Alpaka; Strieborné; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
de: Bocal-Material: Vergoldet; Neusilber; Silber; Edelstahl; Sonstige
ro-RO: Materialul bocalului: Placat cu aur; Alpaca (nichel-argint); Argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
nl: Bokaalmateriaal: Verguld; Nieuwzilver; Zilver; Roestvrij staal; Overige
pt-BR: Material do bocal: Banhado a ouro; Alpaca; Prata; Aço inoxidável; Outros
bg-BG: Материал на бокала: Позлатен; Алпака; Сребро; Неръждаема стомана; Друго